dictsource/zhy_rules
// Cantonese Chinese

// condition ?1   Canton(Guangzhou) Tones


//voice=zh-yue    // to find the voice for this dictionary


.group a
        aa          a
        aai         ai
        aau         au
        aae         aE
        aao         aO
        a           6
        ai          6i
        au          6u
        ar          A         
        ae          ae
        aw          3
        ann         6~
        aann        a~

.group b
        b           p
        bb          bb


.group c
        c           tsh
        ch          tSh
        cj          ts\\h
        cl          tKh

.group d
        d           t
        dd          dd

.group e
        e           E
        ee          e
        ea          @
        ei          ei
        eu          Eu
        ew          e
        eo          8
        er          V
        enn         E~
        ewnn        e~
	    eoi			8i
	    eoy			8y

.group f
        f           f

.group g
        g           k
        gn          n`
        gw          kw
        gv          kv
        gg          g
        gj          c
        gx          G

.group h
        h           h
     @) h           ?

.group i
        i           i
        ii          1
        iz          i\[
        iw          I
        iu          iu
        iaa         ia
        ia          i6
        inn         i~
        iwnn        I~
?1      ik          Ik
?1      ing         IN

.group j
        j           j

.group k
        k           kh
        kw          khw
        kv          khv
        kj          ch
     @) k           k

.group l
        l           l

.group m
        m           m
        mb          mb
     X) m (X        m=
.group n
		nn			_
        n           n
        ng          N
     X) ng (X       N=
        ngg         Ng
        nd          nd
        nj          J

.group o
        o           O
        oa          Q
        oo          o
	    oe	        9
        ou          Ou
        oi          Oi
        or          7
        ow          3\\
        onn         O~
        oonn        o~

.group p
        p           ph
     @) p           p

.group q
        q           ?

.group r
        r           r\\
        rr          r

.group s
        s           s
        sh          S
        sj          s\\
        sl          K

.group t
        t           th
        th          T
     @) t           t

.group u
        u           u
        uu          }
        uw          U
        unn         u~
        ui          ui
?1      uk          Uk
?1      ung         UN

.group v
        v           v

.group w
        w           w

.group x
        x           x

.group y
        yu          y
        y           y
        yw          Y

.group z
        z           ts
        zh          tS
        zj          ts\\
        zl          tK
        zz          z

.group
        1   55
        2   35
        3   44
        4   31
        5   24
        6   33
        7   53  // high fall
        8   31  // mid fall
        9   13  // very low rise

    |   _|
